Illinois, session 104th, HB5112.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Carryout Bag Reduction Act. 6    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act:7    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 8Agency.9    "Carryout bag" means a plastic bag, recycled paper bag, or 10reusable bag that is provided by a retail mercantile 11establishment either (i) at the checkout, cash register, or 12point of sale to a consumer for the purpose of transporting 13goods out of the retail mercantile establishment or (ii) to a 14consumer for the purpose of delivering goods from the location 15of a retail mercantile establishment to the location of the 16consumer.17    "Consumer" means any person who makes a purchase at 18retail.19    "Department" means the Department of Revenue.20    "Person" means an individual, natural person, public or 21private corporation, government, partnership, unincorporated 22association, or other entity.23    "Plastic" means an organic or petroleum-derived synthetic   HB5112- 2 -LRB104 16994 BDA 30408 b1or semisynthetic solid material that is synthesized by the 2polymerization of organic substances, that is moldable into 3various rigid and flexible forms, and that may have had other 4substances added to it.5    "Plastic bag" means a single-use plastic bag that is 6provided by a retail mercantile establishment at the checkout, 7cash register, or point of sale to a consumer for the purposes 8of transporting goods out of the retail mercantile 9establishment and that is not a recycled paper bag or reusable 10bag. "Plastic bag" does not include:11        (1) a bag that is used to package bulk items, such as 12    fruit, vegetables, nuts, and grains;13        (2) a bag that is used for greeting cards, balloons, 14    or small hardware items, such as nails and bolts;15        (3) a bag that is used to contain or wrap frozen foods, 16    meat, or fish, whether prepackaged or not;17        (4) a bag that is used to contain or wrap flowers or 18    potted plants or other items where dampness may be a 19    problem;20        (5) a bag that is used to contain unwrapped prepared 21    foods or bakery goods;22        (6) a bag that is used to contain prescription drugs;23        (7) a bag that is sold in packages containing multiple 24    bags intended for use as garbage bags, pet waste bags, or 25    landscape waste bags;26        (8) a bag that is brought to a store by the consumer   HB5112- 3 -LRB104 16994 BDA 30408 b1    for the consumer's own use or to carry away from the store 2    goods that are not placed in a bag provided by the store;3        (9) a bag that is provided by a dine-in or take-out 4    restaurant to contain food or drink purchased by the 5    restaurant's consumer;6        (10) a bag containing a plastic liner that is 7    permanently affixed, or designed and intended to be 8    permanently affixed, to the inside of the particular bag;9        (11) a newspaper bag, door-hanger bag, laundry 10    cleaning bag, garment bag; or11        (12) a bag that is used for online or digital orders 12    where an employee of the retail mercantile establishment 13    packages the goods for curbside pick-up or delivery.14    "Primarily engaged in the sale of ready-to-eat food for 15immediate consumption" means having sales of ready-to-eat food 16for immediate consumption comprising at least 51% of the total 17sales, excluding the sale of liquor.18    "Recycled paper bag" means a paper bag that is 100% 19recyclable and contains at least 40% post-consumer recycled 20material.21    "Restaurant" means any business that is primarily engaged 22in the sale of ready-to-eat food for immediate consumption.23    "Retail mercantile establishment" means a business that 24makes sales at retail and generates occupation or use tax 25revenue. "Retail mercantile establishment" does not include a 26restaurant.  HB5112- 4 -LRB104 16994 BDA 30408 b1    "Reusable bag" means a bag with threaded stitched handles 2that is designed and manufactured for multiple uses; that can 3carry 22 pounds for a distance of 175 feet; and that is made of 4cloth, fiber, or other fabric or recycled material that is 5machine washable and can be cleaned and disinfected regularly. 6    Section 10. Carryout Bag Fee Fund. 7    (a) The Carryout Bag Fee Fund is created as a special fund 8in the State treasury. Moneys in the Fund shall be used as 9provided in this Act. 10    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 11Carryout Bag Fee Fund is not subject to sweeps, administrative 12charges or chargebacks, or any other fiscal or budgetary 13maneuver that would in any way transfer any funds from the 14Carryout Bag Fee Fund into any other fund of the State.  15    Section 15. Payment of carryout bag fee required. 16    (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, a carryout bag fee of $0.10 17is imposed on each carryout bag used by a consumer at a retail 18mercantile establishment located in Illinois, which shall be 19paid by the consumer. Beginning January 1, 2028, the carryout 20bag fee shall be increased to $0.15 per carryout bag; 21beginning January 1, 2029, the carryout bag fee shall be 22increased to $0.20 per carryout bag; and beginning January 1, 232030, the carryout bag fee shall be increased to $0.25 per 24carryout bag. The ultimate incidence and liability for payment   HB5112- 5 -LRB104 16994 BDA 30408 b1of the carryout bag fee is to be borne by the consumer. The fee 2shall be separately stated on the receipt provided to the 3consumer and shall be identified as the carryout bag fee. It is 4a violation of this Section for the retail mercantile 5establishment to fail to separately itemize the fee on a 6consumer's purchase of such a carryout bag or to otherwise 7absorb the fee on such sale.8    Beginning January 1, 2027, the retail mercantile 9establishment shall retain $0.02 of each carryout bag fee that 10it collects; beginning January 1, 2028, it shall retain $0.03 11of each carryout bag fee that it collects; beginning January 121, 2029, it shall retain $0.04 of each carryout bag fee that it 13collects; and beginning January 1, 2030, it shall retain $0.05 14of each carryout bag fee that it collects. The retail 15mercantile establishment shall remit the remainder of the 16carryout bag fees that it collects each month to the 17Department on form ST-1.18    The Department shall deposit into the Carryout Bag Fee 19Fund the portion of the carryout bag fees that are remitted to 20it. The Department shall monthly transfer into the General 21Revenue Fund $0.06 of the portion of each carryout bag fee that 22is remitted to it for 2027, $0.09 of the portion of each 23carryout bag fee that is remitted to it for 2028, $0.012 of the 24portion of each carryout bag fee that is remitted to it for 252029, and $0.15 of the portion of each carryout bag fee that is 26remitted to it for 2030. The Department shall monthly remit   HB5112- 6 -LRB104 16994 BDA 30408 b1the remainder of the fee for each year to the county where the 2retail mercantile establishment that collected the fee is 3located, except that, if a municipal joint action agency or a 4municipality with a population greater than 1,000,000 is 5located in the county, then the Department shall remit the fee 6directly to either the municipal joint action agency if the 7fee was collected from a retail mercantile establishment 8located within the municipal joint action agency service area 9or to the municipality with a population greater than 101,000,000 if the fee was collected from a retail mercantile 11establishment located within the municipality with a 12population greater than 1,000,000.13    (b) Beginning January 1, 2027, plastic bags shall not be 14used to transport goods from a retail mercantile establishment 15for delivery to the location of the consumer. Only recyclable 16paper bags or reusable bags shall be used for deliveries to 17consumer locations. Retail mercantile establishments are 18encouraged to implement a system that reuses containers or 19reusable bags to deliver goods to consumers. The reuse system 20must be able to demonstrate to the Agency that the containers 21or reusable bags used to deliver goods to consumers can be used 22at least 75 times before disposal. If such a demonstration is 23made and if the Agency approves the demonstration, the 24containers or reusable bags used shall be exempt from the 25requirements of this Section.   HB5112- 7 -LRB104 16994 BDA 30408 b1    Section 20. Data requirements, program evaluation and 2program goals. 3    (a) By March 1, 2028, and March 1 of each year thereafter, 4the Department shall report to the General Assembly and shall 5post on the Department's website the total revenue generated 6from the carryout bag fee and the total number of carryout bags 7purchased by consumers in the previous calendar year in each 8county, municipal joint action agency service area, and 9municipality with a population greater than 1,000,000.10    (b) After the report required by subsection (a) has been 11filed with the General Assembly and posted on the Department's 12website for calendar year 2030, the Department shall calculate 13the percentage decrease, if any, in the number of carryout 14bags purchased by consumers from calendar year 2027 through 15calendar year 2030. If the number of carryout bags purchased 16by consumers in 2030 decreased by at least 90% compared to 172027, the carryout bag fee shall remain at $0.25 per carryout 18bag. If the percentage decrease in carryout bags purchased by 19consumers has decreased by less than 90%, the carryout bag fee 20shall be increased by another $0.05. The carryout bag fee 21shall increase by $0.05 annually each calendar year until a 2290% or greater reduction, compared to 2027, has been achieved. 23If the carryout bag use at any time in future annual reports 24show that sales of carryout bags to consumers are no longer 25less than at least 90% compared to 2027, the carryout bag fee 26shall be increased by $0.05 annually until carryout bag use   HB5112- 8 -LRB104 16994 BDA 30408 b1again is at least 90% less than 2027. 2    Section 25. Use of the carryout bag fee by counties, 3municipal joint action agencies, or municipalities with a 4population greater than 1,000,000. The county, municipal joint 5action agency, or municipality with a population greater than 61,000,000 shall use the revenue received from the carryout bag 7fee for the following purposes: 8        (1) preparing and implementing waste management plans 9    pursuant to the Solid Waste Planning and Recycling Act;10        (2) inspecting and monitoring facilities used to 11    manage municipal waste;12        (3) paying for salaries and benefits of public sector 13    employees, and costs associated with consultants and legal 14    counsel hired to assist with developing and implementing 15    programs consistent with this Section;16        (4) implementing litter clean-up programs and events;17        (5) increasing access to recycling and composting in 18    areas deemed to be in environmental justice areas;19        (6) developing and implementing education programs to 20    increase participation in recycling programs, composting 21    programs, household hazardous waste programs, and special 22    collection events;23        (7) conducting household hazardous waste collection 24    programs; or25        (8) conducting special collection events.   HB5112- 9 -LRB104 16994 BDA 30408 b1    Section 30. Exemption. The carryout bag fee does not apply 2to the retail sale or use of carryout bags that are used to 3carry items purchased pursuant to the Supplemental Nutrition 4Assistance Program or a similar governmental food assistance 5program. 6    Section 35. Education material and signage. 7    (a) Every retail mercantile establishment subject to the 8carryout bag fee shall conspicuously display a sign in a 9location outside or inside the establishment, viewable by 10consumers, alerting consumers to the carryout bag fee.11    (b) The Agency shall develop educational and promotional 12material, including a sign that complies with subsection (a) 13of this Section. The Agency shall make the materials available 14on the Agency's website for use by retail mercantile 15establishments that are subject to the requirements of this 16Act. 17    Section 40. Enforcement. 18    (a) A person who violates any provision of this Act shall 19be liable for a civil penalty of up to $250 for the first 20offense within a 12-month period; a civil penalty of up to $500 21for a second offense within a 12-month period; and a penalty of 22up to $1,000 for a third or subsequent offense within a 2312-month period.  HB5112- 10 -LRB104 16994 BDA 30408 b1    (b) Any violation of this Act may be enforced by the 2Attorney General or the State's Attorney of the county in 3which the violation occurs. The penalties provided for in 4subsection (a) may be recovered in a civil action brought in 5the name of the people of the State of Illinois by the State's 6Attorney of the county in which the violation occurred or by 7the Attorney General. Any penalties collected under this 8Section in an action in which the Attorney General has 9prevailed shall be deposited into the Solid Waste Management 10Fund. The Attorney General or the State's Attorney of a county 11in which a violation occurs may institute a civil action for an 12injunction, prohibitory or mandatory, to restrain violations 13of this Act or to require such actions as may be necessary to 14address violations of this Act.15    (c) The penalties and injunctions provided in this Act are 16in addition to penalties, injunctions, or other relief 17provided under any other law. Nothing in this Act bars a cause 18of action by the State for any other penalty, injunction, or 19other relief provided by any other law. 20    Section 45. Carryout bag audits; home rule. The power to 21audit taxes or fees on the collection, remittance, and payment 22of any fees on carryout bags, however defined, is an exclusive 23power and function of the State. A municipality or county, 24including a home rule municipality or county, may not conduct 25a financial audit, with respect to the provision of carryout   HB5112- 11 -LRB104 16994 BDA 30408 b1bags, of any person that provides a carryout bag to a consumer, 2except that any municipality or county with an ordinance 3related to carryout bags in effect as of January 1, 2026 may 4continue to audit carryout bags until January 1, 2030. This 5Section is a denial and limitation of home rule powers and 6functions under subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII of 7the Illinois Constitution. 8    Section 50. Regulation of carryout bags; home rule. A 9municipality or county, including a home rule unit, may not 10regulate in any manner the use, disposition, content, 11taxation, or sale of any carryout bag, however defined, that 12is provided by a retail mercantile establishment at the 13checkout, cash register, point of sale, or other point of 14departure to a consumer for the purpose of transporting goods 15out of the retail mercantile establishment, except that any 16municipality or county with an ordinance related to carryout 17bags in effect on the effective date of this Act may continue 18to regulate carryout bags until January 1, 2030, and except 19that any home rule municipality or county may prohibit a 20retail mercantile establishment from providing plastic bags to 21consumers. This Section is a denial and limitation of home 22rule powers and functions under subsection (g) of Section 6 of 23Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 24    Section 80. The State Finance Act is amended by adding   HB5112- 12 -LRB104 16994 BDA 30408 b1Section 5.1038 as follows: 2    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)3    Sec. 5.1038. The Carryout Bag Fee Fund.  4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.  HB5112- 13 -LRB104 16994 BDA 30408 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    New Act4    30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new